California statutes. Business and Professions Code
None of the provisions of this chapter shall be applicable to any school or schools conducted by any well recognized church or denomination for the purpose of training the adherents of such church or denomination in the care of the sick in accordance with its religious tenets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 807.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Penal Provisions [2795. - 2800.]

2795.

Except as provided in this chapter, it is unlawful for any person to do any of the following:

(a) To practice or to offer to practice nursing in this state unless the person holds a license in an active status.

(b) To use any title, sign, card, or device to indicate that he or she is qualified to practice or is practicing nursing, unless the person has been duly licensed or certified under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 350, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2796.

It is unlawful for any person or persons not licensed or certified as provided in this chapter to use the title “registered nurse,” the letters “R.N. ,” or the words “graduate nurse,” “trained nurse,” or “nurse anesthetist.”

It is unlawful for any person or persons not licensed or certified as provided in this chapter to impersonate a professional nurse or pretend to be licensed to practice professional nursing as provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 696, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

2797.

It is unlawful for a person to wilfully make any false representation or to impersonate any other person or permit or aid any person in any manner to impersonate him in connection with any examination or application for a license, or request to be examined or licensed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 807.)
-------------------------------------------

2798.

(a) It is unlawful for anyone to conduct a school of nursing unless the school has been approved by the board.

(b) If the board has a reasonable belief, either by complaint or otherwise, that a school is allowing students to apply for its nursing program and that nursing program does not have the approval of the board, the board shall immediately order the school to cease and desist from offering students the ability to enroll in its nursing program. The board shall also notify the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education and the Attorney General’s office that the school is offering students the ability to enroll in a nursing program that does not
 have the approval of the board.

(c) It shall be unprofessional conduct for any registered nurse to violate or attempt to violate, either directly or indirectly, or to assist or abet the violation of, this section.

(d) This section is not applicable to schools conducted under Section 2789 of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 789, Sec. 6.   (SB 122)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2799.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon a conviction thereof shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 10 days nor more than one year, or by a fine of not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 10.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

2800.

None of the sections in this article, except Sections 2796 and 2797, shall be applicable to any person or persons specifically exempted from the general provisions of this act by Section 2731 hereof, or to schools conducted by any well-recognized church or denomination for the purpose of training the adherents of the church or denomination in the care of the sick in accordance with its religious tenets. An adherent of any well-recognized church or denomination who engages in nursing or the care of the sick in connection with the practice of the religious tenets of the well-recognized church or denomination may use the word “nurse” in connection with or following their name, provided they shall not use the title “registered nurse,” the letters “R.N.,” the words “graduate nurse,” “trained nurse,” “nurse
 anesthetist,” or any other name, word, or symbol in connection with or following their name so as to lead another or others to believe that they are a professional nurse licensed under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 42.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Revenue [2810. - 2815.7.]

2810.

There is established in the State Treasury a Board of Registered Nursing Fund. The California Board of Nursing Education and Nurse Registration Fund of the State of California is abolished. The Controller, on, January 1, 1975, shall transfer any balance in that fund to the Board of Registered Nursing Fund. Any reference in state law to the Board of Nurse Examiners Fund or the Board of Nurse Examiners Fund of the State of California shall be construed to refer to the Board of Registered Nursing Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 632.)
-------------------------------------------

2811.

(a) Each person holding a regular renewable license under this chapter, whether in an active or inactive status, shall apply for a renewal of their license and pay the biennial renewal fee required by this chapter every two years on or before the last day of the month following the month in which their birthday occurs, beginning with the second birthday following the date on which the license was issued, whereupon the board shall renew the license.

(b) A license not renewed in accordance with this section shall expire but may within a period of eight years thereafter be reinstated upon payment of the fee required by this chapter and upon submission of proof of the applicant’s qualifications as may be required by the board. During the eight-year period, no examination
 shall be required as a condition for the reinstatement of an expired license that has lapsed solely by reason of nonpayment of the renewal fee. After the expiration of the eight-year period, the board may require as a condition of reinstatement that the applicant pass an examination as the board deems necessary to determine their present fitness to resume the practice of professional nursing.

(c) A license in an inactive status may be restored to an active status if the licensee meets the continuing education standards of Section 2811.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 43.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2811.1.

(a) The board, upon application and payment of the fee established pursuant to subdivision (h), shall issue a retired license to a registered nurse, if the licensee meets both of the following qualifications:

(1) Holds an
 unrestricted license on the date of application.

(2) If not already on record, furnishes to the Department of Justice, as directed by the board, fingerprints for the purpose of conducting a criminal history record check and for the purpose of undergoing a state and federal level criminal offender record information search conducted through the Department of Justice.

(b) An applicant may elect to retire upon renewal or upon submission of an application to the board as required.

(c) A retired licensee shall be exempt from continuing education requirements.

(d) A retired licensee shall utilize their professional title only with the unabbreviated word
 “retired” directly preceding or directly following the professional title.

(e) A retired licensee may provide nursing services to the public free of charge in any public health program created by federal, state, or local law or administered by a federal, state, county, or local governmental entity, if a licensed registered nurse or nurses provide adequate medical and nursing supervision. These services shall be limited to services that the retired licensee was permitted to perform under the licensee’s active license and that the licensee is competent to perform, as determined by the supervising licensed registered nurse. A retired licensee shall not engage in any activity that requires an active registered nurse or advanced practice registered nurse license.

(f) The board may investigate potential violations or take action against a retired license for a violation of this chapter.
 For this purpose, a retired license is deemed a lapsed license as that term is used in Section 2764.

(g) The board may reinstate a retired license to active status one time only, if the retired licensee fulfills the requirements for renewal of a license, including furnishing fingerprints, paying renewal fees, and providing evidence of the following, as applicable:

(1) For a retired licensee who has been retired for eight years or less, 30 hours of continuing education taken within the previous two-year period.

(2) For a retired licensee who has been retired for more than eight years, either a current valid active and clear registered nurse license in another state, a United States territory, or Canada, or passing the current examination for licensure.

(h) The board, by regulation, may establish a fee for a retired license in an amount not less than one-half of the regular renewal fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 449, Sec. 1.   (AB 633)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2811.5.

(a) Each person renewing their license under Section 2811 shall submit proof satisfactory to the board that, during the preceding two-year period, they have been informed of the developments in the registered nurse field or in any special area of practice engaged in by the licensee, occurring since the last renewal thereof, either by pursuing a course or courses of continuing education in the registered nurse field or relevant to the practice of the licensee, and approved by the board, or by other means deemed equivalent by the board.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the board, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, shall do the following:

(1) By January 1,
 2019, deliver a report to the appropriate legislative policy committees detailing a comprehensive plan for approving and disapproving continuing education opportunities.

(2) By January 1, 2020, report to the appropriate legislative committees on its progress implementing this plan.

(c) For purposes of this section, the board shall, by regulation, establish standards for continuing education. The standards shall be established in a manner to ensure that a variety of alternative forms of continuing education are available to licensees, including, but not limited to, online, academic studies, in-service education, institutes, seminars, lectures, conferences, workshops, extension studies, and home study programs. The standards shall take cognizance of specialized areas of practice, and content shall be relevant to the practice of nursing and shall be related to the scientific
 knowledge or technical skills required for the practice of nursing or be related to direct or indirect patient or client care. The continuing education standards established by the board shall not exceed 30 hours of direct participation in a course or courses approved by the board, or its equivalent in the units of measure adopted by the board.

(d) The board shall audit continuing education providers at least once every five years to ensure adherence to regulatory requirements, and shall withhold or rescind approval from any provider that is in violation of the regulatory requirements.

(e) The board shall encourage continuing education in spousal or partner abuse detection and treatment. In the event the board establishes a requirement for continuing education coursework in spousal or partner abuse detection or treatment, that requirement shall be met by each licensee within no
 more than four years from the date the requirement is imposed.

(f) In establishing standards for continuing education, the board shall consider including a course in the special care needs of individuals and their families, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Pain and symptom management, including palliative care.

(2) The psychosocial dynamics of death.

(3) Dying and bereavement.

(4) Hospice care.

(g) (1) In establishing standards for continuing education, the board shall consider including a course in menopausal mental or physical health.

(2) In establishing standards for continuing education, the board shall consider including a course in maternal mental health.

(h) This section shall not apply to licensees during the first two years immediately following their initial licensure in California or any other governmental jurisdiction, except that, beginning January 1, 2023, those licensees shall complete one hour of direct participation in an implicit bias course offered by a continuing education provider approved by the board that meets all the same requirements outlined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 2786, including, but not limited to, the identification of the licensees’ previous or current unconscious biases and misinformation and corrective measures to decrease implicit bias at the interpersonal and institutional levels, including ongoing policies and practices for that purpose.

(i) The board may, in accordance with the intent of this section, make exceptions from continuing education requirements for licensees residing in another state or country, or for reasons of health, military service, or other good cause.

(j) For the purpose of fulfilling the requirements of subdivision (a), the following apply:

(1) A nurse practitioner who provides primary care to a patient population of which over 25 percent are 65 years of age or
 older shall certify that they have completed at least 20 percent of all existing mandatory continuing education hours in a course in the field of gerontology, the special care needs of patients with dementia, or the care of older patients at the time of renewal.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2027, a nurse practitioner who provides care to a patient population composed of adult women under 65 years of age who completes one or more continuing education courses in perimenopause, menopause, or postmenopausal care shall receive two hours for each hour of a completed course, not to exceed six hours, if the following are met:

(A) The course or course provider is accredited by one of the following:

(i) American Nurses Credentialing Center.

(ii) American Association of Nurse Practitioners.

(iii) Accreditation Council for Continuing Medical Education.

(iv) Joint Accreditation for Interprofessional Continuing Education.

(v) The successor organization to an organization specified under this subparagraph.

(B) If the course covers multiple topics, the additional hours are only granted for the hours specified by the course provider as covering perimenopause, menopause, or postmenopausal care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 4.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2811.6.

Providers of continuing education programs approved by the board pursuant to Section 2811.5 shall make available for board inspection records of continuing education courses given to registered nurses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 167.)
-------------------------------------------

2812.

Within 10 days after the beginning of each month, the board shall report to the State Controller the amount and source of all collections made under this chapter. At the same time, all amounts shall be paid into the State Treasury, where they shall be placed to the credit of the Board of Registered Nursing Fund and to the Registered Nurse Education Fund, as specified in Section 128400 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 11.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2814.

All money in the Board of Registered Nursing Fund shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to carry out this chapter and the promotion of nursing education in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 520, Sec. 8.   (SB 799)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2815.

Subject to the provisions of Section 128.5, the amount of the fees prescribed by this chapter in connection with the issuance of licenses for registered nurses under its provisions is that fixed by the following schedule:

(a) (1) The fee to be paid upon the filing by a graduate of an approved school of nursing in this state of an application for a licensure by examination shall be fixed by the board at not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(2) The fee to be paid upon the filing by a graduate of a school of nursing in another state, district, or territory of the United States of an application for a licensure by examination shall be fixed by the board at not more than one thousand dollars
 ($1,000).

(3) The fee to be paid upon the filing by a graduate of a school of nursing in another country of an application for a licensure by examination shall be fixed by the board at not more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

(4) The fee to be paid upon the filing of an application for licensure by a repeat examination shall be fixed by the board at not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(b) The fee to be paid for taking each examination shall be the actual cost to purchase an examination from a vendor approved by the board.

(c) (1) The fee to be paid for application by a person who is licensed or registered as a nurse in another state, district, or territory of the United States for licensure by endorsement
 shall be fixed by the board at not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(2) The fee to be paid for application by a person who is licensed or registered as a nurse in another country for licensure by endorsement shall be fixed by the board at not more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

(d) (1) The biennial fee to be paid upon the filing of an application for renewal of the license shall be not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750). In addition, an assessment of ten dollars ($10) shall be collected and credited to the Registered Nurse Education Fund, pursuant to Section 2815.1.

(2) The fee to be paid upon the filing of an application for reinstatement pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2811 shall be not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(e) The penalty fee for failure to renew a license within the prescribed time shall be fixed by the board at not more than 50 percent of the regular renewal fee, but not more than three hundred seventy-five dollars ($375).

(f) The fee to be paid for approval of a continuing education provider shall be fixed by the board at not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(g) The biennial fee to be paid upon the filing of an application for renewal of provider approval shall be fixed by the board at not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(h) The penalty fee for failure to renew provider approval within the prescribed time shall be fixed at not more than 50 percent of the regular renewal fee, but not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(i) The penalty for submitting insufficient funds or fictitious check, draft or order on any bank or depository for payment of any fee to the board shall be fixed at not more than thirty dollars ($30).

(j) The fee to be paid for an interim permit shall be fixed by the board at not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(k) The fee to be paid for a temporary license shall be fixed by the board at not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(l) The fee to be paid for processing endorsement papers to other states shall be fixed by the board at not more than two hundred dollars ($200).

(m) The fee to be paid for a certified copy of a school transcript shall be fixed by the board
 at not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(n) (1) The fee to be paid for a duplicate pocket license shall be fixed by the board at not more than seventy-five dollars ($75).

(2) The fee to be paid for a duplicate wall certificate shall be fixed by the board at not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(o) (1) The fee to be paid by a registered nurse for an evaluation of their qualifications to use the title “nurse practitioner” shall be fixed by the board at not more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

(2) The fee to be paid by a registered nurse for a temporary certificate to practice as a nurse practitioner shall be fixed by the board at not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(3) The fee to be paid upon the filing of an application for renewal of a certificate to practice as a nurse practitioner shall be not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(4) The penalty fee for failure to renew a certificate to practice as a nurse practitioner within the prescribed time shall be not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(p) The fee to be paid by a registered nurse for listing as a “psychiatric mental health nurse” shall be fixed by the board at not than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750).

(q) The fee to be paid for duplicate National Council Licensure Examination for registered nurses (NCLEX-RN) examination results shall be not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(r) The fee to be paid for a letter certifying a license shall be not more than thirty dollars ($30).

(s) The fee to be paid for a certificate issued pursuant to Section 2837.103 shall be an amount sufficient to cover the reasonable regulatory cost of issuing the certificate.

(t) The fee to be paid for a certificate issued pursuant to Section 2837.104 shall be an amount sufficient to cover the reasonable regulatory cost of issuing the certificate.

No further fee shall be required for a license or a renewal thereof other than as prescribed by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 413, Sec. 16.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2815.1.

As provided in subdivision (d) of Section 2815, the Board of Registered Nursing shall collect an additional ten dollar ($10) assessment at the time of the biennial licensure renewal. This amount shall be credited to the Registered Nurse Education Fund. This assessment is separate from those fees prescribed in Section 2815.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 640, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2815.5.

The amount of the fees prescribed by this chapter in connection with the issuance of certificates as nurse-midwives is that fixed by the following schedule:

(a) The fee to be paid upon the filing of an application for a certificate shall be fixed by the board at not more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

(b) The biennial fee to be paid upon the application for a renewal of a certificate shall be fixed by the board at not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(c) The penalty fee for failure to renew a certificate within the prescribed time shall be 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the date of the renewal of the license, but not more
 than five hundred dollars ($500).

(d) The fee to be paid upon the filing of an application for the nurse-midwife equivalency examination shall be fixed by the board at not more than two hundred dollars ($200).

(e) The fee to be paid for a temporary certificate shall be fixed by the board at not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 413, Sec. 17.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2815.7.

The board shall report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature whenever the board proposes or adopts an increase in any fee imposed pursuant to this chapter. The board shall specify the reasons for each fee increase and shall identify the percentage of the funds derived from an increase in any fee that will be used for investigational or enforcement related activities by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 352, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Public Health Nurse Certification [2816. - 2820.]

2816.

(a) The nonrefundable fee to be paid by a registered nurse for an evaluation of their qualifications to use the title “public health nurse” shall not be more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).
 All fees payable under this section shall be collected by and paid to the Board of Registered Nursing Fund. It is the intention of the Legislature that the costs of carrying out the purposes of this article shall be covered by the revenue collected pursuant to this section. The board shall refund any registered nurse who paid more than three hundred dollars ($300) for an evaluation of their qualifications to use the title “public health nurse” between April 5, 2018, and December 31, 2018.

(b) A public health nurse certificate is not subject to renewal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 717, Sec. 1.5.   (AB 2471)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2817.

The qualifications prescribed by the board under this article shall include a requirement that an applicant for employment as a public health nurse and all public health nurses employed on or after January 1, 1981, acquire training in child abuse and neglect detection.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1135, Sec. 2.8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2818.

(a) The Legislature recognizes that public health nursing is a service of crucial importance for the health, safety, and sanitation of the population in all of California’s communities. These services currently include, but are not limited to:

(1) Control and prevention of communicable disease.

(2) Promotion of maternal, child, and adolescent health.

(3) Prevention of abuse and neglect of children, elders, and spouses.

(4) Outreach screening, case management, resource coordination and assessment, and delivery and evaluation of care for individuals, families, and communities.

(b) The Legislature also finds that conflicting definitions of “public health nurse” have been created by various state and local agencies within California. The Legislature also finds that the public is harmed by the conflicting usage of the title “public health nurse” and lack of consistency between the use of the term and the qualifications required in state law and in administrative regulations. Therefore, the Legislature finds that the public interest would be served by determining the conditions for the legitimate use by registered nurses of a title which includes the term “public health nurse.”

(c) No individual shall hold himself or herself out as a public health nurse or use a title which includes the term “public health nurse” unless that individual is in possession of a valid California public health nurse certificate issued pursuant to this article.

(d) No employer subject to regulation by Section 602 of the Health and Safety Code shall hold out any employee to be a public health nurse or grant a title to any employee including the term “public health nurse” unless that employee holds a valid California public health nurse certificate pursuant to this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1135, Sec. 2.8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2819.

In order to effect a speedy and efficient transfer of public health nurse certification from the State Department of Health Services to the board, existing Sections 4500 to 4504, inclusive, of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations shall be repealed by the State Department of Health Services and adopted by the board to place them in Chapter 14 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations, and any reference to the State Department of Health Services in those regulations shall be changed to refer to the board. The repeal of the regulations and adoption of the revised regulations pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except that the repealed and adopted regulations shall be filed with the Office of Administrative Law for publication in the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1135, Sec. 2.8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2820.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as expanding the scope of practice of a registered nurse beyond that which is authorized under Section 2725.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1135, Sec. 2.8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Nurse Anesthetists [2825. - 2833.6.]

2825.

This article may be cited as the Nurse Anesthetists Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 696, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

2826.

As used in this article:

(a) “Nurse anesthetist” means a person who is a registered nurse licensed by the board who has met standards for certification from the board. In the certification and recertification process, the board shall consider the standards of the National Board of Certification and Recertification for Nurse Anesthetists, or a successor national professional organization approved by the board, and may develop new standards if there is a public safety need for standards more stringent than the councils’ standards. In determining the adequacy for public safety of the councils’ standards or in developing board standards, the board shall comply with the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing
 with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) “Accredited program” means a program for the education of nurse anesthetists that has received approval from the board. In the approval process, the board shall consider the standards of the Council on Accreditation of Nurse Anesthesia Education Programs and Schools and may develop new standards if the councils’ standards are determined to be inadequate for public safety. In determining the adequacy for public safety of the councils’ standards or in developing board standards, the
 board shall comply with the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) “Anesthesia services” include all of the following:

(1) Preoperative, intraoperative, and postoperative care and pain management provided by a nurse anesthetist for patients receiving anesthesia pursuant to an order by a physician, dentist, or podiatrist for anesthesia services.

(2) Selecting and administering medication pursuant to an order for anesthesia services by a physician, dentist, or podiatrist.

(3) Providing emergency, critical care, and resuscitation services.

(d) “Appropriate committee” means the committee responsible for anesthesia practice that is responsible to the executive committee of the medical staff.

(e) “Trainee” means a registered nurse enrolled in an accredited program of nurse anesthesia.

(f) “Graduate” means a nurse anesthetist who is a graduate of an accredited program of nurse anesthesia awaiting initial certification results for not more than one year from the date of graduation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 169, Sec. 1.   (AB 876)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2826.5.

A nurse anesthetist is authorized to perform anesthesia services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 169, Sec. 2.   (AB 876)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2826.6.

An order by a physician, dentist, or podiatrist for anesthesia services for a specific patient shall be the authorization for the nurse anesthetist to select and implement the modality of anesthesia for the patient and to abort or modify the modality of anesthesia for the patient during the course of care.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 169, Sec. 3.   (AB 876)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2826.7.

The selection and administration of medication by a nurse anesthetist, including controlled substances, for preoperative, intraoperative, and postoperative care and for pain management purposes pursuant to an order by a physician, dentist, or podiatrist shall not constitute a prescription, as that term is defined in Section 1300.01 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 169, Sec. 4.   (AB 876)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2827.

The utilization of a nurse anesthetist to provide anesthesia services in an acute care facility shall be approved by the acute care facility administration and the appropriate committee, and at the discretion of the physician, dentist or podiatrist. If a general anesthetic agent is administered in a dental office, the dentist shall hold a permit authorized by Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 1646) of Chapter 4 or, commencing January 1, 2022, Article 2.75 (commencing with Section 1646) of Chapter 4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 929, Sec. 16.   (SB 501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2828.

In an acute care facility, a nurse anesthetist who is not an employee of the facility shall, nonetheless, be subject to the bylaws of the facility and may be required by the facility to provide proof of current professional liability insurance coverage. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a nurse anesthetist shall be responsible for their own professional conduct and may be held liable for those professional acts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 47.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2829.

It is unlawful for any person or persons to advertise, use any title, sign, card, or device, or to otherwise hold himself or herself out as a “nurse anesthetist” unless the person meets the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 2826 and has been so certified under the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 696, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

2830.

The board shall issue a certificate to practice nurse anesthesia to any person who qualifies under this article and is licensed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 696, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

2830.5.

Every applicant shall show by evidence satisfactory to the board that he or she has met the requirements of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 696, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

2830.6.

Notwithstanding Section 2830, the board shall certify all applicants who can show certification by the National Board of Certification and Recertification for Nurse Anesthetists or a successor national professional organization approved by the board. This certification shall be documented to the board in a manner to be determined by the board. Proof of certification shall be filed with the board within six months from the effective date of this article and the board shall, within one year from the effective date of this article, issue a certificate to applicants who have filed proof of certification within that six-month period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 48.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2830.7.

The amount of the fees prescribed by this chapter in connection with the issuance of certificates as nurse anesthetists is that fixed by the following schedule:

(a) The fee to be paid upon the filing of an application for a certificate shall be fixed by the board at not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

(b) The biennial fee to be paid upon the application for a renewal of a certificate shall be fixed by the board at not less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(c) The
 penalty fee for failure to renew a certificate within the prescribed time shall be 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the date of the renewal of the license, but not less than seventy-five dollars ($75) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(d) The fee to be paid for a temporary certificate shall be fixed by the board at not less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 799, Sec. 20.   (SB 1039)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2831.

An applicant for certification pursuant to this article shall submit a written application in the form prescribed by the board, accompanied by the fee prescribed by Section 2830.7 which shall also apply to the issuance of a certificate under the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 352, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

2832.

Every applicant for a certificate to practice nurse anesthesia shall comply with all the provisions of this article in addition to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 696, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

2833.

(a) Each certificate issued pursuant to this article shall be renewable biennially, and each person holding a certificate under this article shall apply for a renewal of their certificate and pay the biennial renewal fee required by Section 2830.7 every two years on or before the last day of the month following the month in which their birthday occurs, beginning with the second birthday following the date on which the certificate was issued, whereupon the board shall renew the certificate.

(b) Each certificate not renewed in accordance with this section shall expire but may within a period of eight years thereafter be reinstated upon payment of the biennial renewal fee and penalty fee required by Section 2830.7 and upon
 submission of proof of the applicant’s qualifications as may be required by the board. During the eight-year period, no examination shall be required as a condition for the reinstatement of any expired certificate that has lapsed solely by reason of nonpayment of the renewable fee. After the expiration of the eight-year period the board may require, as a condition of reinstatement, that the applicant pass an examination as it deems necessary to determine their present fitness to resume the practice of nurse anesthesia.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 49.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2833.3.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit a certified nurse anesthetist’s ability to practice nursing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 696, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

2833.5.

Except as provided in Section 2725 and in this section, the practice of nurse anesthetist does not confer authority to practice medicine or surgery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 696, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

2833.6.
